District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.05

Payment of rates for water and water service.

All rates for water and water service hereby established shall be payable at least once semiannually. When the computation of the amount of any bill for any of such services results in a fraction of one-half cent or more, the next highest amount not containing a fraction shall be charged.

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VII, § 701(c), 22 DCR 2115

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1505.
1973 Ed., § 43-1504a.

Prior Codifications